Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. Political Subdivisions

§ 22-21-101.
Political Subdivision Bond Election Law.

This chapter including W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

, shall be known as the “Political Subdivision Bond Election Law,” and each election required by law to authorize the issuance of bonds shall be conducted under the provisions hereof, except that statewide bond elections shall be conducted as provided in W.S.

22-21-201

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-285; Laws 1978, ch. 38, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to community college bond elections, see §

21-18-314

.

Applicability. —

The Political Subdivision Bond Election Law is only applicable when an election is “required by law.” Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

The Political Subdivision Bond Election Law appears to be a commendable effort by the legislature in 1973 to make uniform the procedures to be followed when an election is required prior to issuance of bonds of any sort. There is no language requiring an election approval in all instances when revenue bonds are to be issued. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Legislature did not intend for financing of municipal water project to be considered a “bond,” and therefore there was no statutory requirement for an election prior to town's incurring debt. Cooper v. Town of Pinedale, 1 P.3d 1197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2000).

Constitutionality. —

Law for elections in high school districts on bond issues where property and nonproperty owners may vote, held not to violate constitution regarding free elections or elections creating debts. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Immaterial provision. —

Provisions that ballots are to be placed in separate boxes for property owners and nonproperty owners held immaterial, as the provision for box “A” was surplusage. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Presumption of validity. —

An act must be determined as to its validity under the principle that all enactments are presumed to be valid. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

School bond elections. —

High school districts derive right to vote on bond issue from statutes which must be substantially followed, as they have no inherent right to vote on bond issues. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Statutory provisions providing for school elections on bond issue where property and nonproperty owners may vote are not in conflict with constitutional requirements of free elections, art. 1, § 27, Wyo. Const., and equality, art. 6, § 1, Wyo. Const.State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

§ 22-21-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided definitions for the article on political subdivision bond elections.

§ 22-21-103.
How bond question to be submitted to electors; contents.

Each bond question shall be submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of the political subdivision. Every bond election shall be held on the same day as a primary election or a general election, or on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in May or November, or on the Tuesday next following the third Monday in August. Not less than one hundred ten (110) days before a bond election, the political subdivision shall provide written notification to the county clerk specifying the date of the election and the bond question. The bond question shall state the purpose of the bonds, the maximum principal amount thereof, the maximum number of years allowed for the indebtedness and the maximum rate of interest to be paid thereon. The secretary of state may promulgate reasonable rules for conducting bond elections where the election is not held at the same time as the general or primary election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-287; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 183, § 2; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1997, ch. 115, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2018 ch. 101, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

at the beginning of the third sentence, substituted “Not
less than one hundred ten (110) days before a bond election, the political
subdivision shall” for “If calling the election in May,
the body political subdivision shall by March 1,” and deleted
the former fourth sentence, which read: “If the political subdivision
specifies the date of the election to be a primary or general statewide
or other August or November election, then the political subdivision
shall provide notice to the county clerk not less than one hundred
ten (110) days before the election if for a primary or other August
election, and not less than seventy (70) days before the election,
if for a general or other November election.”

Laws 2018,
ch. 101, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

Notice. —

In a challenge to a school district's use of funds obtained from the sale of bonds to construct school facilities, to the extent the challengers' claim challenged the election itself, it was barred as untimely because it was not filed within the 14 day limit for election contests. However, even if the claim was not time barred, there was no defect in the notice provided the public regarding the bond election where the bond questions clearly stated the purpose of the bonds as required by this statute. Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 22-21-104.
Publication or posting of election notice; contents.

Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91) days before a bond election held in conjunction with a primary or other August election and between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days before a bond election held in conjunction with a May, general or other November election, the county clerk shall publish notice of the election at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the political subdivision. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the political subdivision, notice shall be posted at each polling place in the political subdivision between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days before the election. Any notice of election hereunder shall specify the name of the political subdivision, the date, time and place of election, the question or questions to be submitted, and the fact that only qualified electors of the political subdivision may vote thereon. If a bond election is being held within a political subdivision at the same time and place as a regular or other election, the notice of bond election may, at the discretion of the county clerk, be combined with and given in the same manner as the notice of the regular or other election in such political subdivision.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-288; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 2018 ch. 101, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in the first sentence, added the language preceding “the county clerk” and deleted “not less than thirty (30) nor more than forty (40) days before the election” at the end, and in the second sentence substituted “between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days” for “not less than thirty (30) nor more than forty (40) days” following “subdivision.”

Laws 2018, ch. 101, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-21-105.
Election districts.

The political subdivision may be divided by the governing body into convenient subdivisions for the purpose of such election or the governing body may adopt the election districts and precincts established for general or other elections.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-289.

§ 22-21-106.
Errors.

No error in any election on the creation of an indebtedness shall invalidate the election, unless it is determined that the error would change the result.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-290; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-21-107.
Contests; procedure.

Any five (5) qualified electors of the political subdivision may contest an election on the question of the creation of an indebtedness upon filing in the district court of any county in which the political subdivision is wholly or partially located, within fourteen (14) days after the result of the election shall have been determined, a petition alleging an error that would change the result of the election, in like form as in other cases of contested elections in the district court. The political subdivision shall be made defendant, and process shall be served upon the clerk of the governing body or other chief clerical officer as in other civil actions. No civil action contesting the results of such an election or alleging election errors may be commenced after the expiration of such fourteen (14) day period.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-291; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Contests of election results are not actions at law or suits in equity

and were unknown to the common law. Johnson v. Cheyenne, 504 P.2d 1081,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1184 (U.S. 1973).

Proceedings are special and summary in their nature.

Johnson v. Cheyenne, 504 P.2d 1081,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1184 (U.S. 1973).

Strict observance of steps necessary to give jurisdiction is required.

Johnson v. Cheyenne, 504 P.2d 1081,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1184 (U.S. 1973).

And jurisdictional facts must appear on face of proceedings.

If these steps are not followed, courts are powerless to entertain such proceedings. Johnson v. Cheyenne, 504 P.2d 1081,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1184 (U.S. 1973).

Claim time-barred. —

In a challenge to a school district's use of funds obtained from the sale of bonds to construct school facilities, to the extent the challengers' claim challenged the election itself, it was barred as untimely because it was not filed within the 14 day limit for election contests. Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2004).

Petitioner must show that results would have been changed.—

The legislature was aware that even in the absence of such statutory provisions as provided in this section the petitioner would still have the burden of showing that the results would have been changed. Johnson v. Cheyenne, 504 P.2d 1081,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1184 (U.S. 1973).

§ 22-21-108.
Who is entitled to vote.

Any qualified elector in the political subdivision shall be entitled to vote on the bond question in person or by absentee ballot, for the precinct in which he is registered, as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-292; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to registration generally, see §§

22-3-101

to

22-3-117

.

As to absentee voting generally, see §§

22-9-101

to

22-9-125

.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “for the precinct” for “in the precinct”.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Constitutionality of durational residence requirements. —

Durational residence laws are unconstitutional unless a state can demonstrate that such laws are necessary to promote compelling governmental interest, it not being sufficient for a state to show that requirements further a very substantial state interest. Torres v. Laramie County School Dist. No. 1, Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

The legislature is free to establish durational residence requirements for any period for which their investigation shows there is a compelling reason. Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

Guidelines as to residence requirements pending action by legislature. —

The Wyoming supreme court has established guidelines for the direction of election officials and citizens with respect to residence requirements pending action by the legislature. Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1973), appeal dismissed, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (1973). See §

22-1-102

for definition of “residence.”

§ 22-21-109.
Supplies; regulations; costs.

The county clerk may utilize voting machines or electronic voting systems at any bond election and may prescribe the form of the ballot, the duties of election officials, and other reasonable regulations pertaining thereto. The political subdivision holding the bond election shall pay the actual costs of the election or an equitably proportioned share of a concurrent election, as determined by the county clerk.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-293; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence, substituted “the ballot” for “ballot label.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-21-110.
Ballot canvass; results certified; declaration; effect of defeat.

Immediately after the closing of the polls, the counting board shall proceed to count the ballots. The results disclosed by the count shall be certified by the counting board to the clerk of the political subdivision. If the majority of the ballots cast on a bond question is in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the proposal shall be approved, and the governing body of the political subdivision, in the manner provided by law, shall then proceed to declare the results of said election, and complete the printing, execution, advertising, and sale of the bonds, but if the majority is opposed to such issuance, the proposal to issue bonds for the same general purpose shall not again be submitted to election within a period of twelve (12) months or as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-294; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-21-111.
Authority granted.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed as authorizing any type of project or the issuance of bonds for any purpose not otherwise authorized by the laws specifically applicable to the political subdivision in question.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-295.

§ 22-21-112.
Effect on prior bond elections.

This act [§§

22-21-101

through

22-27-101

] shall have no effect on any bond election heretofore conducted, and any bonds authorized at such an election which have not been delivered may be sold and delivered as if this act had not been adopted.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-296.